Utah statutes.
20A-11-102.   Candidates and committee members to file statement of ownership of publication.

(1)  Before any newspaper or periodical wholly or partially owned by a media owner may print any matter that is intended or tends to influence, directly or indirectly, any voting at any election, the media owner shall file a verified statement in the office of the county clerk of the county in which he resides.

(2)  The statement shall:

(a)  identify the newspaper or periodical in which or over which the media owner has financial interest or control; and

(b)  the exact nature and extent of the interest or control.

(3) (a)  It is unlawful for an editor, manager, or other person controlling the publication of any newspaper or other periodical circulating in Utah that is wholly or partially owned by a media owner to print or cause to be printed  any matter that is intended or tends to influence, directly or indirectly, any voting at any election unless the media owner has filed the statement required by this section.

(b)  Any editor, manager, or other person who violates this Subsection (3) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

